Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4389.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Purpose
The purpose of this act is to align Massachusetts firearm laws with constitutional
principles as affirmed by recent federal court rulings (New York State Rifle and Pistol
Association, Inc. V. Bruen; Supreme Court decision 2022), including the decision by the Fifth
Circuit Court of Appeals, which found that restrictions on handgun sales to individuals aged 18
to 20 violate the Second Amendment of the United States Constitution. It has been long standing
law that the age of maturation is 18 years of age. Over time, the Massachusetts state legislature
has slowly taken away the common rights and advantages of adulthood while affirming other
rights, not only on adults aged 18-20, but on children as young as 11 years old.
SECTION 2. Amendment to Firearm Licensing Laws
of 2

(a) Chapter 140 of the General Laws, Section 131, is hereby amended by striking the
words “21 years of age” wherever they appear and inserting in place thereof the words “18 years
of age.”
(b) Chapter 140, Section 129B, is amended to allow individuals 18 years of age and older
to apply for a Firearm Identification (FID) card without restriction and for a License to Carry
(LTC) under the same conditions as those 21 and older.
SECTION 3. Lawful Purchase and Possession
(a) Any law restricting the purchase of handguns by individuals aged 18 to 20 is hereby
repealed.
(b) Licensed firearm dealers may lawfully sell handguns to individuals aged 18 and older
who meet all other requirements under state and federal law.
SECTION 4. Constitutional Compliance
This act is enacted in response to the ruling by the United States Court of Appeals for the
Fifth Circuit, which determined that bans on firearm purchases by legal adults aged 18 to 20 are
unconstitutional under the Second Amendment.
SECTION 5. Implementation and Effective Date
This act shall take effect immediately upon passage.
of 2